California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(i) The board itself, or the administrative law judge if one is designated by the board, shall hear the petition and shall prepare a written decision setting forth the reasons supporting the decision. In a decision granting a petition reinstating a license or modifying a penalty, the board itself, or the administrative law judge, may impose any terms and conditions that the agency deems reasonably appropriate, including those set forth in
 Sections 823 and 4990.40. If a petition is heard by an administrative law judge sitting alone, the administrative law judge shall prepare a proposed decision and submit it to the board. The board may take action with respect to the proposed decision and petition as it deems appropriate.

(j) The petitioner shall pay a fingerprinting fee and provide a current set of their fingerprints to the board. The petitioner shall execute a form authorizing release to the board or its designee, of all information concerning the petitioner’s current physical and mental condition. Information provided to the board pursuant to the release shall be confidential and shall not be subject to discovery or subpoena in any other proceeding, and shall not be admissible in any action, other than before the board, to determine the petitioner’s fitness to practice as required by Section 822.

(k) The board
 may delegate to its executive officer authority to order investigation of the contents of the petition.

(l) No petition shall be considered while the petitioner is under sentence for any criminal offense, including any period during which the petitioner is on court-imposed probation or parole or the petitioner is required to register pursuant to Section 290 of the Penal Code. No petition shall be considered while there is an accusation or petition to revoke probation pending against the petitioner.

(m) Except in those cases where the petitioner has been disciplined for violation of Section 822, the board may in its discretion deny without hearing or argument any petition that is filed pursuant to this section within a period of two years from the effective date of a prior decision following a hearing under this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 647, Sec. 47.   (SB 801)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

4990.31.

The board may deny without a hearing a request to petition for termination of probation or modification of penalty for any of the following reasons:

(a) The petitioner has failed to comply with the terms and conditions of the disciplinary order.

(b) The board is conducting an investigation of the petitioner while he or she is on probation.

(c) The petitioner has a subsequent arrest that is substantially related to the qualifications, functions, or duties of the licensee or registrant and this arrest occurred while on probation.

(d) The petitioner’s probation with the board is currently tolled.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 261, Sec. 1.   (SB 531)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

4990.32.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in this section, an accusation filed pursuant to Section 11503 of the Government Code against a licensee or registrant under the chapters the board administers and enforces shall be filed within three years from the date the board discovers the alleged act or omission that is the basis for disciplinary action or within seven years from the date the alleged act or omission that is the basis for disciplinary action occurred, whichever occurs first.

(b) An accusation filed against a licensee alleging the procurement of a license by fraud or misrepresentation is not subject to the limitations set forth in subdivision
 (a).

(c) The limitations period provided by subdivision (a) shall be tolled for the length of time required to obtain compliance when a report required to be filed by the licensee or registrant with the board pursuant to Article 11 (commencing with Section 800) of Chapter 1 is not filed in a timely fashion.

(d) An accusation alleging sexual misconduct shall be filed within three years after the board discovers the act or omission alleged as the grounds for disciplinary action or within 10 years after the act or omission alleged as the grounds for disciplinary action occurred, whichever occurs first. This subdivision shall apply to a complaint alleging sexual misconduct received by the board on and after January 1, 2002.

(e) If
 an alleged act or omission involves a minor, the seven-year limitations period provided for by subdivision (a) and the 10-year limitations period provided for by subdivision (d) shall be tolled until the minor reaches the age of majority. However, if the board discovers an alleged act of sexual contact with a minor under Section 261, 286, 287, 288, 288.5, or 289 of, or former Section 288a of, the Penal Code after the limitations periods described in this subdivision have otherwise expired, and there is independent evidence that corroborates the allegation, an
 accusation shall be filed within three years from the date the board discovers that alleged act.

(f) The limitations period provided by subdivision (a) shall be tolled during any period if material evidence necessary for prosecuting or determining whether a disciplinary action would be appropriate is unavailable to the board due to an ongoing criminal investigation.

(g) For purposes of this section, “discovers” means the latest
 of the occurrence of any of the following with respect to each act or omission alleged as the basis for disciplinary action:

(1) The date the board received a complaint or report describing the act or omission.

(2) The date, subsequent to the original complaint or report, on which the board became aware of any additional acts or omissions alleged as the basis for disciplinary action against the same individual.

(3) The date the board receives from the complainant a written release of information pertaining to the complainant’s diagnosis and treatment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 423, Sec. 3.   (SB 1494)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

4990.33.

Notwithstanding any other law, except as provided in Section 4990.32, the expiration, cancellation, forfeiture, or suspension of a license, registration, or other authority to practice by operation of law or by order or decision of the board or a court of law, the placement of a license on a retired status, or the voluntary surrender of a license or registration by a licensee or registrant, of any license or registration within the authority of the board, shall not deprive the board of jurisdiction to commence or proceed with any investigation of, or action or disciplinary proceeding against, the licensee or registrant or to render a decision suspending or revoking the license or registration.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 261, Sec. 2.   (SB 531)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

4990.34.

(a) The board may place a license or registration issued under the chapters it administers and enforces on probation under the following circumstances:

(1) In lieu of, or in addition to, any order of the board suspending or revoking the license or registration.

(2) Upon the issuance of a license or registration to an individual who has been guilty of unprofessional conduct but who otherwise completed all education, training, and experience required for licensure or registration.

(3) As a condition upon the reissuance or reinstatement of a license or registration that has been suspended or revoked by the board.

(b) The board may adopt regulations establishing a monitoring program to ensure compliance with any terms or conditions of probation imposed by the board pursuant to subdivision (a). The cost of probation or monitoring may be ordered to be paid by the licensee or registrant.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 659, Sec. 21.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

4990.36.

The board, in its discretion, may require a licensee or registrant whose license or registration has been placed on probation or whose license or registration has been suspended, to obtain additional professional training and to pass an examination upon completion of that training and to pay any necessary examination fee. The examination may be written, oral, or a practical or clinical examination.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 659, Sec. 21.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

4990.38.

The board may deny an application or may suspend or revoke a license or registration issued under the chapters it administers and enforces for any disciplinary action imposed by this state or another state or territory or possession of the United States, or by a governmental agency on a license, certificate or registration to practice marriage and family therapy, clinical social work, educational psychology, professional clinical counseling, or any other healing art. The disciplinary action, which may include denial of licensure or revocation or suspension of the license or imposition of restrictions on it, constitutes unprofessional conduct. A certified copy of the disciplinary action decision or judgment shall be conclusive evidence of that action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 350, Sec. 33.   (SB 943)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

4990.40.

The board shall revoke a license or registration issued under the chapters it administers and enforces upon a decision made in accordance with the procedures set forth in Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, that contains a finding of fact that the licensee or registrant engaged in an act of sexual contact, as defined in Section 729, when that act is with a patient or with a former patient when the relationship was terminated primarily for the purpose of engaging in that act. The revocation shall not be stayed by the administrative law judge or the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 659, Sec. 21.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

4990.42.

The proceedings under this article shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 659, Sec. 21.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 14. Social Workers [4991. - 4998.5.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [4991. - 4991.2.]

4991.

This chapter shall be known, and may be cited, as the Clinical Social Worker Practice Act. It shall be liberally construed to effect its objectives.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 659, Sec. 23.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

4991.1.

A person engages in the practice of clinical social work when he or she performs or offers to perform or holds himself or herself out as able to perform this service for remuneration in any form, including donations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 148, Sec. 3.   (SB 274)   Effective August 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

4991.2.

For purposes of this chapter:

(a) “Accredited school of social work” means a school that is accredited by the Commission on Accreditation of the Council on Social Work Education.

(b) “Board” means the Board of Behavioral Sciences.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 640, Sec. 5.   (AB 232)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Application of Chapter [4992. - 4993.]

4992.

(a) Every applicant for a license under this chapter shall file an application with the board accompanied by the application fee prescribed by this chapter. Every application shall also be accompanied by the applicable examination fee prescribed by this chapter.

(b) The application shall contain information showing that the applicant has all the qualifications required by the board for admission to an examination.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 703, Sec. 36.   (SB 1491)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

4992.05.

(a) A registrant or an applicant for licensure as a clinical social worker shall pass the following two examinations as prescribed by the board:

(1) A California law and ethics examination.

(2) A clinical examination.

(b) Upon registration with the board, an associate clinical social worker registrant, within the first year of registration, shall take an examination on California law and ethics.

(c) A registrant or an applicant for licensure may take the clinical examination only upon meeting all of the following requirements:

(1) Completion of all education requirements.

(2) Passage of the California law and ethics examination.

(3) Completion of all required supervised work experience.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 743, Sec. 24.   (AB 93)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

4992.07.

(a) An applicant who had previously taken and passed the standard written examination but had not passed the clinical vignette examination shall also obtain a passing score on the clinical examination in order to be eligible for licensure.

(b) An applicant who had previously failed to obtain a passing score on the standard written examination shall obtain a passing score on the California law and ethics examination and the clinical examination.

(c) An applicant who had obtained eligibility for the standard written examination shall take the California law and ethics examination and the clinical examination.

(d) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2016.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 473, Sec. 38.   (SB 821)   Effective January 1, 2014.   Section initially operative January 1, 2016, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

4992.09.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (a) of Section 4992.07, an applicant and registrant shall obtain a passing score on a board-administered California law and ethics examination in order to qualify for licensure.

(b) A registrant shall participate in a board-administered California law and ethics examination before their registration renewal.

(c) If an applicant fails the California law and ethics examination,
 they
 may retake the examination, upon payment of the required fees, without further application.

(d) The board shall not issue a subsequent registration
 number unless the applicant has passed the California law and ethics examination.

(e) A registrant shall complete a minimum of three hours of continuing education in the subject of California law and ethics during each renewal period to be eligible to renew their registration, regardless of whether they have passed the California law and ethics examination. The coursework shall be obtained from a board-accepted provider of continuing education, as specified in Section 4996.22.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 520, Sec. 7.   (AB 1759)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

4992.1.

(a) Only individuals who have the qualifications prescribed by the board under this chapter are eligible to take an examination under this chapter.

(b) Every applicant who is issued a clinical social worker license shall be examined by the board.

(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the board may destroy all examination materials two years following the date of an examination.

(d) The board shall not deny any applicant, whose application for licensure is complete, admission to the clinical examination, nor shall the board postpone or delay any applicant’s
 clinical
 examination, solely upon the receipt by the board of a complaint alleging acts or conduct that would constitute grounds to deny licensure.

(e) If an applicant for examination who has passed the California law and ethics examination is the subject of a complaint or is under board investigation for acts or conduct that, if proven to be true, would constitute grounds for the board to deny licensure, the board shall permit the applicant to take the clinical examination for licensure, but may notify the applicant that licensure will not be granted pending completion of the investigation.

(f) Notwithstanding Section 135, the board may deny any applicant who has previously failed either the California law and ethics examination or the clinical examination permission to retake
 either examination pending completion of the investigation of any complaint against the applicant. Nothing in this section shall prohibit the board from denying an applicant admission to any examination, or refusing to issue a license to any applicant when an accusation or statement of issues has been filed against the applicant pursuant to Section 11503 or 11504 of the Government Code, or the applicant has been denied in accordance with subdivision (b) of Section 485.

(g) An applicant shall not be eligible to participate in the clinical examination if the applicant fails to obtain a passing score on the clinical examination within seven years from their initial attempt, unless the applicant takes and obtains a passing score on the current version of the California law and ethics examination.

(h) A passing score on the clinical examination shall be accepted by the board for a period of seven years from the date the examination was taken.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 456, Sec. 71.   (SB 786)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

4992.2.

“Advertising,” as used in this chapter, includes, but is not limited to, any public communication as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 651, the issuance of any card, sign, or device to any person, or the causing, permitting, or allowing of any sign or marking on, or in, any building or structure, or in any newspaper, magazine, or directory, or any printed matter whatsoever, with or without any limiting qualification. Signs within religious buildings or notices in bulletins from a religious organization mailed to a congregation are not advertising within the meaning of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 787, Sec. 79.   (SB 775)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4992.3.

The board may deny a license or a registration, or may suspend or revoke the license or registration of a licensee or registrant if the licensee or registrant has been guilty of unprofessional conduct. Unprofessional conduct includes, but is not limited to, the following:

(a) The conviction of a crime substantially related to the qualifications, functions, or duties of a licensee or registrant under this chapter. The record of conviction shall be conclusive evidence only of the fact that the conviction occurred. The board may inquire into the circumstances surrounding the commission of the crime in order to fix the degree of discipline or to determine if the conviction is substantially related to the
 qualifications, functions, or duties of a licensee or registrant under this chapter. A conviction has the same meaning as defined in Section 7.5. The board may order any license or registration suspended or revoked, or may decline to issue a license or registration when the time for appeal has elapsed, or the judgment of conviction has been affirmed on appeal, or, when an order granting probation is made suspending the imposition of sentence. All actions pursuant to this subdivision shall be taken pursuant to Division 1.5 (commencing with Section 475).

(b) Securing a license or registration by fraud, deceit, or misrepresentation on any application for licensure or registration submitted to the board, whether engaged in by an applicant for a license or registration, or by a licensee in support of any application for licensure or
 registration.

(c) Administering to themselves any controlled substance or using any of the dangerous drugs specified in Section 4022 or any alcoholic beverage to the extent, or in a manner, as to be dangerous or injurious to the person applying for a registration or license or holding a registration or license under this chapter, or to any other person, or to the public, or, to the extent that the use impairs the ability of the person applying for or holding a registration or license to conduct with safety to the public the practice authorized by the registration or license. The board shall deny an application for a registration or license or revoke the license or registration of any person who uses or offers to use drugs in the course of performing clinical social work. This provision does not apply to any person also licensed as a physician
 and surgeon under Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 2000) or the Osteopathic Act who lawfully prescribes drugs to a patient under the person’s care.

(d) Incompetence in the performance of clinical social work.

(e) An act or omission that falls sufficiently below the standard of conduct of the profession as to constitute an act of gross negligence.

(f) Violating, attempting to violate, or conspiring to violate this chapter or any regulation adopted by the board.

(g) Misrepresentation as to the type or status of a license or registration held by the licensee or registrant or otherwise misrepresenting or permitting misrepresentation of the licensee’s or
 registrant’s education, professional qualifications, or professional affiliations to any person or entity. For purposes of this subdivision, this misrepresentation includes, but is not limited to, misrepresentation of the person’s qualifications as an adoption service provider pursuant to Section 8502 of the Family Code.

(h) Impersonation of another by any licensee, registrant, or applicant for a license or registration, or, in the case of a licensee or registrant, allowing any other person to use the licensee’s or registrant’s license or registration.

(i) Aiding or abetting, or employing, directly or indirectly, any unlicensed or unregistered person to engage in conduct for which a license or registration is required under this chapter.

(j) Intentionally or recklessly causing physical or emotional harm to any client.

(k) The commission of any dishonest, corrupt, or fraudulent act substantially related to the qualifications, functions, or duties of a licensee or registrant.

(l) Engaging in sexual relations with a client or with a former client within two years from the termination date of therapy with the client, soliciting sexual relations with a client, or committing an act of sexual abuse, or sexual misconduct with a client, or committing an act punishable as a sexually related crime, if that act or solicitation is substantially related to the qualifications, functions, or duties of a clinical social worker.

(m) Performing, or holding oneself
 out as being able to perform, or offering to perform or permitting, any registered associate, trainee, or applicant for licensure under supervision to perform any professional services beyond the scope of the license authorized by this chapter.

(n) Failure to maintain confidentiality, except as otherwise required or permitted by law, of all information that has been received from a client in confidence during the course of treatment and all information about the client that is obtained from tests or other means.

(o) Prior to the commencement of treatment, failing to disclose to the client or prospective client the fee to be charged for the professional services, or the basis upon which that fee will be computed.

(p) Paying, accepting, or soliciting any consideration, compensation, or remuneration, whether monetary or otherwise, for the referral of professional clients. All consideration, compensation, or remuneration shall be in relation to professional counseling services actually provided by the licensee. This subdivision does not prevent collaboration among two or more licensees in a case or cases. However, no fee shall be charged for that collaboration, except when disclosure of the fee has been made in compliance with subdivision (o).

(q) Advertising in a manner that is false, fraudulent, misleading, or deceptive, as defined in Section 651.

(r) Reproduction or description in public, or in any publication subject to general public distribution, of any psychological test
 or other assessment device, the value of which depends in whole or in part on the naivete of the subject, in ways that might invalidate the test or device. A licensee shall limit access to that test or device to persons with professional interest who are expected to safeguard its use.

(s) Any conduct in the supervision of any registered associate, trainee, or applicant for licensure by any licensee that violates this chapter or any rules or regulations adopted by the board.

(t) Performing or holding oneself out as being able to perform mental health services beyond the scope of one’s competence, as established by one’s education, training, or experience. This subdivision shall not be construed to expand the scope of the license authorized by this chapter.

(u) Permitting an applicant for licensure, trainee, or registrant under one’s supervision or control to perform, or permitting the supervisee to hold themselves out as competent to perform, mental health services beyond the supervisee’s level of education, training, or experience.

(v) The violation of any law governing the gaining or supervision of experience required by this chapter.

(w) Failure to keep records consistent with sound clinical judgment, the standards of the profession, and the nature of the services being rendered.

(x) Failure to comply with the child abuse reporting requirements of Section 11166 of the Penal Code.

(y) Failure to comply with the elder and dependent adult abuse reporting requirements of Section 15630 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(z) Willful violation of Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 123100) of Part 1 of Division 106 of the Health and Safety Code.

(aa) Failure to comply with the procedures set forth in Section 2290.5 when delivering health care via telehealth.

(ab) (1) Engaging in an act described in Section 261, 286, 287, or 289 of, or former Section 288a of, the Penal Code with a minor or an act described in Section 288 or 288.5 of the Penal Code regardless of whether the act occurred prior to or after the time the registration
 or license was issued by the board. An act described in this subdivision occurring prior to the effective date of this subdivision shall constitute unprofessional conduct and shall subject the licensee to refusal, suspension, or revocation of a license under this section.

(2) The Legislature hereby finds and declares that protection of the public, and in particular minors, from sexual misconduct by a licensee is a compelling governmental interest, and that the ability to suspend or revoke a license for sexual conduct with a minor occurring prior to the effective date of this section is equally important to protecting the public as is the ability to refuse a license for sexual conduct with a minor occurring prior to the effective date of this section.

(ac) Engaging in any conduct
 that subverts or attempts to subvert any licensing examination or the administration of the examination as described in Section 123.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 787, Sec. 80.   (SB 775)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4992.31.

(a) The Board of Behavioral Sciences shall require an applicant for clinical social work licensure or registration as an associate clinical social worker, as defined in Sections 4996, 4996.9, and 4996.18, to undergo a fingerprint-based state and national criminal history background check, pursuant to Section 144.

(b) The board shall submit to the Department of Justice fingerprint images and related information for individuals specified in subdivision (a) who are subject to a state and national criminal history background check, pursuant to subdivision (u) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code. The Department of Justice shall provide a state- and federal-level response pursuant to subdivision (p) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 113, Sec. 17.   (SB 160)   Effective September 17, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

4992.33.

The board shall revoke any license issued under this chapter upon a decision made in accordance with the procedures set forth in Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, that contains any finding of fact that the licensee or registrant engaged in any act of sexual contact, as defined in Section 729, when that act is with a patient, or with a former patient when the relationship was terminated primarily for the purpose of engaging in that act. The revocation shall not be stayed by the administrative law judge or the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 658, Sec. 25.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

4992.35.

The board may refuse to issue any registration or license whenever it appears that an applicant may be unable to practice his or her profession safely due to mental illness or chemical dependency. The procedures set forth in Article 12.5 (commencing with Section 820) of Chapter 1 shall apply to any denial of a license or registration pursuant to this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 384, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

4992.36.

The board may deny an application, or may suspend or revoke a license or registration issued under this chapter, for any of the following:

(a) Denial of licensure, revocation, suspension, restriction, or any other disciplinary action imposed by another state or territory of the United States, or by any other governmental agency, on a license, certificate, or registration to practice clinical social work or any other healing art shall constitute grounds for disciplinary action for unprofessional conduct. A certified copy of the disciplinary action decision or judgment shall be conclusive evidence of that action.

(b) Revocation, suspension, or restriction by the board of a license,
 certificate, or registration to practice clinical social work, marriage and family therapy, professional clinical counseling, or educational psychology against a licensee or registrant shall also constitute grounds for disciplinary action for unprofessional conduct under this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 350, Sec. 35.   (SB 943)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

4992.4.

The proceedings for the suspension or revocation of licenses under this chapter shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and the board shall have all the powers granted therein.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 820, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

4992.5.

Examinations may be held at those times and places as the board may determine. However, one examination shall be held during each calendar year.

The board may make arrangements with organizations furnishing examination materials as it may deem desirable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 826, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

4992.7.

Every person who willfully makes any false statement or who impersonates any other person or permits or aids any other person to impersonate him or her in connection with any application or examination is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 820, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

4992.8.

A licensee or registrant shall give written notice to the board of a name change, giving both the old and new names. The written notice shall be submitted to the board within 30 days of the issuance of a new government-issued photographic identification. The licensee or registrant shall certify the information is correct by signing a statement under penalty of perjury. A copy of both of the following documents evidencing the change shall be submitted with the notice:

(a) A current government-issued photographic identification.

(b) The legal document authorizing the name change, such as a court order or a marriage
 certificate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 573, Sec. 11.   (SB 800)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

4992.10.

A licensed clinical social worker who owns a business using a fictitious business name shall not use a name that is false, misleading, or deceptive, and shall inform the patient, prior to the commencement of treatment, of the name and license designation of the owner or owners of the practice.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 747, Sec. 9.   (AB 690)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

4993.

(a) A licensed clinical social worker shall retain a client’s or patient’s health service records for a minimum of seven years from the date therapy is terminated. If the client or patient is a minor, the client’s or patient’s health service records shall be retained for a minimum of seven years from the date the client or patient reaches 18 years of age. Health service records may be retained in either a written or an electronic format.

(b) This section shall apply only to the records of a client or patient whose therapy is terminated on or after January 1, 2015.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 312, Sec. 3.   (SB 578)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Licensure [4996. - 4997.1.]

4996.

(a) Only individuals who have received a license under this article may style themselves as “Licensed Clinical Social Workers.” Every individual who styles himself or herself or who holds himself or herself out to be a licensed clinical social worker, or who uses any words or symbols indicating or tending to indicate that he or she is a licensed clinical social worker, without holding his or her license in good standing under this article, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(b) It is
 unlawful for any person to engage in the practice of clinical social work unless at the time of so doing such person holds a valid, unexpired, and unrevoked license under this article.

(c) A clinical social worker licensed under this chapter is a licentiate for purposes of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 805, and thus is a health care practitioner subject to the provisions of Section 2290.5 pursuant to subdivision (b) of that section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 20, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

4996.1.

(a) Effective January 1, 2016, the board shall issue a clinical social worker license to each applicant who qualifies pursuant to this article and who successfully passes a California law and ethics examination and a clinical examination. An applicant who has successfully passed a previously administered written examination may be subsequently required to take and pass another written examination.

(b) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2016.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 799, Sec. 53) by Stats. 2013, Ch. 473, Sec. 43.   (SB 821)   Effective January 1, 2014.   Section operative January 1, 2016, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

4996.2.

Each applicant for a license shall furnish evidence satisfactory to the board that the applicant complies with all of the following requirements:

(a) Is at least 21 years of age.

(b) Has received a master’s degree from an accredited school of social work.

(c) Has had two years of supervised post-master’s degree experience, as specified in Section 4996.23.

(d) Not be subject to denial of licensure pursuant to Section 480. The board shall not issue a registration or license to any person who has been convicted of any crime in this or another state or in a territory of the United States that
 involves sexual abuse of children or who is required to register pursuant to Section 290 of the Penal Code or the equivalent in another state or territory, in accordance with Section 480.

(e) Has completed adequate instruction and training in the subject of alcoholism and other chemical substance dependency. This requirement applies only to applicants who matriculate on or after January 1, 1986.

(f) Has completed instruction and training in spousal or partner abuse assessment, detection, and intervention. This requirement applies to an applicant who began graduate training during the period commencing on January 1, 1995, and ending on December 31, 2003. An applicant who began graduate training on or after January 1, 2004, shall complete a minimum of 15 contact hours of coursework in spousal or partner abuse assessment, detection, and intervention strategies, including knowledge of
 community resources, cultural factors, and same gender abuse dynamics. Coursework required under this subdivision may be satisfactory if taken either in fulfillment of other educational requirements for licensure or in a separate course.

(g) Has completed a minimum of 10 contact hours of training or coursework in human sexuality as specified in Section 1807 of Title 16 of the California Code of Regulations. This training or coursework may be satisfactory if taken either in fulfillment of other educational requirements for licensure or in a separate course.

(h) Has completed a minimum of seven contact hours of training or coursework in child abuse assessment and reporting as specified in Section 1807.2 of Title 16 of the California Code of Regulations. This training or coursework may be satisfactory if taken either in fulfillment of other educational requirements for licensure or
 in a separate course.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 647, Sec. 49.   (SB 801)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

4996.3.

(a) The board shall assess the following fees relating to the licensure of clinical social workers:

(1) The application fee for registration as an associate clinical social worker shall be one hundred fifty dollars ($150). The board may adopt regulations to set the fee at a higher amount, up to a maximum of three hundred dollars ($300).

(2) The fee for annual renewal of an associate clinical social worker registration shall be one hundred fifty dollars ($150). The board may adopt regulations to set the fee at a higher amount, up to a maximum of three hundred dollars ($300).

(3) The fee for application for licensure shall be two hundred
 fifty dollars ($250). The board may adopt regulations to set the fee at a higher amount, up to a maximum of five hundred dollars ($500).

(4) (A) (i) The fee for the board-administered clinical examination, if the board chooses to adopt this examination in regulations, shall be two hundred fifty dollars ($250). The board may adopt regulations to set the fee at a higher amount, up to a maximum of five hundred dollars ($500).

(ii) The fee for the California law and ethics examination shall be one hundred fifty dollars ($150). The board may adopt regulations to set the fee at a higher amount, up to a maximum of three hundred dollars ($300).

(B) An applicant who fails to appear for an examination, after having been scheduled to take the examination, shall forfeit the examination
 fees.
